apertium-ewo.ewo.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%>                                  ! Nom comun; Noun
%<num%>                                ! 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 
Numerals ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N 

%<n%>:                                 # ;

LEXICON Num

%<num%>:                               # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Numerals 

fóg:fóg                                Num ; ! "un; one"
tán:tán                                Num ; ! "cinc; five"

LEXICON Nouns 

məndím:məndím                          N   ; ! "eau; water"
yób:yób                                N   ; ! "ciel; sky"
sî:sî                                  N   ; ! "tierre; land"
fàm:fàm                                N   ; ! "homme; man"
zambà:zambà                            N   ; ! "dieu; god"
ekôb:ekôb                              N   ; ! "peau; skin"
nlô:nlô                                N   ; ! "tête; head"
adzó:adzó                              N   ; ! "problème; problem" ! PL: mezdó
wò:wò                                  N   ; ! "main; hand" ! PL: mò
ndá:ndá                                N   ; ! "maison; house"
ndûan:ndûan                            N   ; ! "feu; fire"
ndzón:ndzón                            N   ; ! "route; route"

!La femme = Minînga (pluriel : Bininga)
!L'enfant = Môngö (pluriel : Böngö)
!La fête/ la Danse = Abók (pluriel : Mebók)
!L'amour = Eding
!Le pied = Aköl (pluriel : Meköl)
